Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.100

Insurance proceeds.

(1) Insurance proceeds payable to the slayer or abuser as the beneficiary or assignee of any policy or certificate of insurance on the life of the decedent, or as the survivor of a joint life policy, shall be paid instead to the estate of the decedent, unless the policy or certificate designate some person other than the slayer or abuser or his or her estate as secondary beneficiary to him or her and in which case such proceeds shall be paid to such secondary beneficiary in accordance with the applicable terms of the policy.

(2) If the decedent is beneficiary or assignee of any policy or certificate of insurance on the life of the slayer or abuser, the proceeds shall be paid to the estate of the decedent upon the death of the slayer or abuser, unless the policy names some person other than the slayer or abuser or his or her estate as secondary beneficiary, or unless the slayer or abuser by naming a new beneficiary or assigning the policy performs an act which would have deprived the decedent of his or her interest in the policy if he or she had been living.

[ 2009 c 525 s 10; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.100. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 10.]